West Virginia, session 2025, SB846.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9E. AIR QUALITY IN NEW SCHOOLS ACT. §18-9E-4. Heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning technicians. [Repealed.]  NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal the section of code related to heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning technicians. Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home